Utah statutes.
34A-1-401.   Attorney general and county attorneys -- Duties.

If requested by the commission, the attorney general or any county or district attorney shall:

(1)  institute and prosecute the necessary actions or proceedings for the enforcement of any order of the commission or of any of the provisions of this title; or

(2)  defend any suit, action, or proceeding brought against the commission.

